Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 475.3, as
last amended by Section 11, Chapter 147, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 475.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 475.3. A. The State Board of Licensure for
Professional Engineers and Surveyors is hereby re-created, to
continue until July 1, 2026 July 1, 2031, in accordance with the
provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law, whose duty it shall be to
administer the provisions of this act. The Board shall consist of
four professional engineers and two professional surveyors, at least
one of whom is shall not be a professional engineer, all of whom
shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of
the Oklahoma State Senate. The Governor shall also appoint one lay
member. The professional engineers and professional surveyors shall
have the qualifications required by this act.

B. Each member of the Board shall file with the Secretary of
State a written oath or affirmation for the faithful discharge of
official duties.
C. Appointments to the Board shall be in such manner and for
such period of time so that no two terms, with the exception of the
term of the lay member, shall expire in the same year. On the
expiration of the term of any member, except the term of the lay
member, the Governor shall in the manner herein provided appoint for
a term of six (6) years a professional engineer or professional
surveyor having the qualifications required in this act. The lay
member of the Board shall be appointed by the Governor to a term
coterminous with that of the Governor. The lay member shall serve
at the pleasure of the Governor. Provided, the lay member may
continue to serve after the expiration of the member’s term until
such time as a successor is appointed. Members may be reappointed
to succeed themselves. Each member may hold office until the
expiration of the term for which he or she was appointed or until a
successor has been duly appointed and has qualified. In the event
of a vacancy on the Board due to resignation, death, or for any
cause resulting in an unexpired term, if not filled by the Governor
within three (3) months, the Board may appoint a provisional member
to serve in the interim until the Governor acts.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1465 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 4th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1465 Page 3